Nebraska, session 109, LB461.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB461 LB461
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 16-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
16-1027 (1) At any time before the retirement date, the retiring
firefighter may elect to receive his or her pension benefit at retirement
either in the form of a straight life annuity or any optional form of
annuity benefit established by the retirement committee and provided
under a purchased annuity contract. Such optional annuity benefit shall
be specified in the funding medium for the retirement system and shall
include a straight life annuity with a guarantee of at least sixty
monthly payments or an annuity payable for the life of the retiring
firefighter and, after the death of the retiree, monthly payments, as
elected by the retiring firefighter, of one hundred percent, seventy-five
percent, or fifty percent of the amount of annuity payable to the
retiring firefighter during his or her life, to the beneficiary selected
by the retiring firefighter at the time of the original application for
an annuity. For any firefighter whose retirement date is on or after
January 1, 1997, the optional benefit forms for the retirement system
shall include annual payments, quarterly payments, monthly payments, or a
single lump-sum payment of the firefighter's retirement value. For
firefighters whose retirement date is prior to January 1, 1997, a single
lump-sum payment shall be available only if the city has adopted such
distribution option in the funding medium established for the retirement
system. The retiring firefighter may further elect to defer the date of
the first payment or lump-sum distribution to the first day of any
specified month prior to age seventy. In the event the retiring
firefighter elects to receive his or her pension benefit in the form of
an annuity, the amount of such annuity benefit shall be the amount
provided by the annuity contract purchased or otherwise provided by the
firefighter's retirement value as of the date of the first payment. Any
such annuity contract purchased by the retirement system may be
distributed to the retiring firefighter. Upon the payment of a lump sum
-2-

LB461 LB461
2025 2025
or the distribution of a paid-up annuity contract, all obligations of the
retirement system to pay retirement benefits to the firefighter and his
or her beneficiaries shall terminate, without exception.
(2) For all firefighters employed on January 1, 1984, the amount of
the pension benefit at the retirement date shall not be less than the
following amounts:
(a) If retirement from the city occurs following age fifty-five with
twenty-one years of service with the city, fifty percent of regular pay;
(b) If retirement from the city occurs following age fifty but
before age fifty-five with at least twenty-one years of service with the
city, such firefighter shall receive the actuarial equivalent of the
benefit which would otherwise be provided at age fifty-five;
(c) If retirement from the city occurs on or after age fifty-five
with less than twenty-one years of service with the city, such
firefighter shall receive a pension of at least fifty percent of the
salary he or she was receiving at the time of retirement multiplied by
the ratio of the years of service to twenty-one;
(d) For terminations of employment from the city on or after
September 9, 1993, if such termination of employment as a firefighter
occurs before age fifty-five but after completion of twenty-one years of
service with the city, such firefighter shall receive upon the attainment
of age fifty-five a pension benefit of fifty percent of regular pay;
(e) Unless an optional annuity benefit is selected by the retired
firefighter, at the death of any such retired firefighter the same rate
of pension as is provided for in this section shall be paid to the
surviving spouse of such deceased firefighter during such time as the
surviving spouse remains unmarried and, in case there is no surviving
spouse, then the minor children, if any, of such deceased firefighter
shall equally share such pension benefit during their minority, except
that as soon as a child of such deceased firefighter ceases to be a
minor, such pension as to such child shall cease; or
-3-

LB461 LB461
2025 2025
(f) In the event a retired firefighter or his or her surviving
beneficiaries die before the aggregate amount of pension payments
received by the firefighter and his or her survivor beneficiaries, if
any, equals the total amount in the firefighter's employee account, at
the time of the first benefit payment the difference between the total
amount in the employee's account and the aggregate amount of pension
payments received by the retired firefighter and his or her surviving
beneficiaries, if any, shall be paid in a single sum to the firefighter's
estate.
A firefighter entitled to a minimum pension benefit under this
subsection may elect to receive such pension benefit in any form
permitted by subsection (1) of this section, including a single lump-sum
payment, if the firefighter retires on or after January 1, 1997, or if
the city has adopted a lump-sum distribution option for firefighters
retiring before January 1, 1997, in the funding medium for the retirement
system. If the minimum pension benefit is paid in the form of an optional
annuity benefit or a single lump-sum payment, such benefit or payment
shall be the actuarial equivalent of the annuity that would otherwise be
paid to the firefighter pursuant to this subsection.
If the firefighter chooses the single lump-sum payment option, the
firefighter may request that the actuarial equivalent be equal to the
average of the cost of two annuity contracts based on products available
for purchase in Nebraska, if the difference between the cost of the two
annuity contracts does not exceed five percent. Of the two annuity
contracts used for comparison, one shall be chosen by the firefighter and
one shall be chosen by the city. If the difference between the two
annuity contracts exceeds five percent, the retirement committee shall
review the costs of the two annuity contracts and make a recommendation
to the city council as to the amount of the lump-sum payment to be made
to the firefighter. The city council shall, after a hearing, determine
the amount of the single lump-sum payment due the firefighter. The
-4-

LB461 LB461
2025 2025
annuity contracts used for comparison shall all use the same type of sex-
neutral basis benefit calculation.
(3) If the retirement value of a firefighter entitled to a minimum
pension benefit under subsection (2) of this section is not sufficient at
the time of the first payment to purchase or provide the required pension
benefit, the city shall utilize such funds as may be necessary from the
unallocated employer account of the retirement system to purchase or
provide for the required pension benefit.
(4) Any retiring firefighter whose pension benefit is less than
twenty-five dollars per month on the straight life annuity option shall
be paid a lump-sum settlement equal to the retirement value in lieu of
annuity and shall not be entitled to elect to receive annuity benefits.
Sec. 2. Original section 16-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-5-